Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 1. Limitation of Actions Affecting Realproperty

Cross references:

For limitation of action to enforce mechanics’ liens, see § 38-22-110; for the five-year statute of limitations for recovery of land sold for taxes, see § 39-12-101; for redemption of mining property sold for taxes, see § 39-12-102; for redemption of real property sold for taxes owned by persons under disability, see § 39-12-104; for other statutes of limitations in special situations, see articles 80 and 81 of title 13.

38-41-101.
Limitation of eighteen years.

No person shall commence or maintain an action for the recovery of the title or possession or to enforce or establish any right or interest of or to real property or make an entry thereon unless commenced within eighteen years after the right to bring such action or make such entry has first accrued or within eighteen years after he or those from, by, or under whom he claims have been seized or possessed of the premises. Eighteen years’ adverse possession of any land shall be conclusive evidence of absolute ownership.

The limitation provided for in subsection (1) of this section shall not apply against the state, county, city and county, city, irrigation district, public, municipal, or quasi-municipal corporation, or any department or agency thereof. No possession by any person, firm, or corporation, no matter how long continued, of any land, water, water right, easement, or other property whatsoever dedicated to or owned by the state of Colorado, or any county, city and county, city, irrigation district, public, municipal, or quasi-municipal corporation, or any department or agency thereof shall ever ripen into any title, interest, or right against the state of Colorado, or such county, city and county, city, public, municipal, or quasi-municipal corporation, irrigation district, or any department or agency thereof.

In order to prevail on a claim asserting fee simple title to real property by adverse possession in any civil action filed on or after July 1, 2008, the person asserting the claim shall prove each element of the claim by clear and convincing evidence.

In addition to any other requirements specified in this part 1, in any action for a claim for fee simple title to real property by adverse possession for which fee simple title vests on or after July 1, 2008, in favor of the adverse possessor and against the owner of record of the real property under subsection (1) of this section, a person may acquire fee simple title to real property by adverse possession only upon satisfaction of each of the following conditions:

The person presents evidence to satisfy all of the elements of a claim for adverse possession required under common law in Colorado; and

Either the person claiming by adverse possession or a predecessor in interest of such person had a good faith belief that the person in possession of the property of the owner of record was the actual owner of the property and the belief was reasonable under the particular circumstances.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the provisions of subsections (3) and (5) of this section shall be limited to claims of adverse possession for the purpose of establishing fee simple title to real property and shall not apply to the creation, establishment, proof, or judicial confirmation or delineation of easements by prescription, implication, prior use, estoppel, or otherwise, nor shall the provisions of subsections (3) or (5) of this section apply to claims or defenses for equitable relief under the common-law doctrine of relative hardships, or claims or defenses governed by any other statute of limitations specified in this article. Nothing in this section shall be construed to mean that any elements of a claim for adverse possession that are not otherwise applicable to the creation, establishment, proof, or judicial confirmation or delineation of easements by prescription, implication, prior use, estoppel, or otherwise are made applicable pursuant to the provisions of this section.

Where the person asserting a claim of fee simple title to real property by adverse possession prevails on such claim, and if the court determines in its discretion that an award of compensation is fair and equitable under the circumstances, the court may, after an evidentiary hearing separately conducted after entry of the order awarding title to the adverse possessor, award to the party losing title to the adverse possessor:

Damages to compensate the party losing title to the adverse possessor for the loss of the property measured by the actual value of the property as determined by the county assessor as of the most recent valuation for property tax purposes. If the property lost has not been separately taxed or assessed from the remainder of the property of the party losing title to the adverse possessor, the court shall equitably apportion the actual value of the property to the portion of the owner’s property lost by adverse possession including, as appropriate, taking into account the nature and character of the property lost and of the remainder.

An amount to reimburse the party losing title to the adverse possessor for all or a part of the property taxes and other assessments levied against and paid by the party losing title to the adverse possessor for the period commencing eighteen years prior to the commencement of the adverse possession action and expiring on the date of the award or entry of final nonappealable judgment, whichever is later. If the property lost has not been separately taxed or assessed from the remainder of the property of the party losing title to the adverse possessor, such reimbursement shall equitably apportion the amount of the reimbursement to the portion of the owner’s property lost by adverse possession, including, as appropriate, taking into account the nature and character of the property lost and of the remainder. The amount of the award shall bear interest at the statutory rate from the dates on which the party losing title to the adverse possessor made payment of the reimbursable taxes and assessments.

At any hearing conducted under this subsection (5), or in the event that adverse possession is claimed solely as a defense to an action for damages based upon a claim for trespass, forcible entry, forcible detainer, or similar affirmative claims by another against the adverse possessor, and not to seek an award of legal title against the claimant, the burden of proof shall be by a preponderance of the evidence. If the defendant is claiming adverse possession solely as a defense to an action and not to seek an award of legal title, the defendant shall so state in a pleading filed by the defendant within ninety days after filing an answer or within such longer period as granted by the court in the court’s discretion, and any such statement shall bind the defendant in the action.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 598, § 30.

CSA:

C. 40, § 136.

CRS 53:

§ 118-7-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-7-1.

L. 67:

P. 351, § 1.

L. 2008:

(3), (4), and (5) added, p. 668, § 1, effective July 1.

38-41-102.
How computed.

If such right or title first accrued to an ancestor, predecessor, or grantor of the person who brings the action or to any person from, by, or under whom he claims, the eighteen years shall be computed from the time when the right or title so accrued.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 599, § 31.

CSA:

C. 40, § 137.

CRS 53:

§ 118-7-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-7-2.

38-41-103.
Evidence of adverse possession.

If the records in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county wherein the real property is situate show by conveyance or other instrument that the party in possession or his predecessors or grantors, through descent, conveyance, or otherwise, have asserted a continuous claim of ownership to the real property adverse to the record owner thereof for a period of eighteen years, then the record shall be deemed prima facie evidence of adverse possession during said period and compliance with the requirements of sections 38-41-101 and 38-41-102.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 599, § 32.

CSA:

C. 40, § 138.

CRS 53:

§ 118-7-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-7-3.

38-41-104.
Time to make an entry or bring an action to recover land.

The right to make an entry or bring an action to recover land shall be deemed to have first accrued at the following times:

When any person is disseised, his right of entry or of action shall be deemed to have accrued at the time of disseisin.

When he claims as heir or devisee of one who died seized or possessed, his right shall be deemed to have accrued at the time of such death, unless there is a tenancy or other estate intervening after the death of such ancestor or devisor, except as provided in section 38-41-112, in which case his right shall be deemed to accrue when such intermediate estate expires or when it would have expired by its own limitations.

When there is such an intermediate estate, and in all cases when the party claims by force of any remainder or reversion, his right, insofar as it is affected by the limitation prescribed in this section, shall be deemed to accrue when the intermediate or precedent estate would have expired by its own limitation, notwithstanding any forfeiture thereof for which he might have entered at an earlier time.

Subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c) shall not prevent a person from entering when entitled to do so by reason of any forfeiture or breach of condition, but if he claims under such a title, his rights shall be deemed to have accrued when the forfeiture was incurred or the condition was broken.

In all cases not otherwise specifically provided for, the right shall be deemed to have accrued when the claimant or the person under whom he claims first became entitled to the possession of the premises under the title upon which the entry or the action is founded.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 599, § 33.

CSA:

C. 40, § 139.

CRS 53:

§ 118-7-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-7-4.

38-41-105.
Abstract of title prima facie evidence.

An abstract of title certified by any reputable Colorado abstractor or abstract company incorporated under the laws of the state of Colorado may be used to establish prima facie evidence that the chain of title is as shown by the abstract, except as to any of the instruments of conveyance or record thereof or certified copy thereof which may be offered in evidence, and the court may take judicial notice of the repute of the abstractor. The absence of tax sale certificates from such abstract for any period of time covered by the abstract shall be prima facie evidence of the payment of taxes during such period by the party relying upon any chain of title shown by such abstract.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 600, § 34.

CSA:

C. 40, § 140.

CRS 53:

§ 118-7-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-7-5.

38-41-106.
Limitation seven years - possession under official and judicial conveyance or orders.

Actions brought for the recovery of any lands, tenements, or hereditaments which any person may claim by virtue of actual residence, occupancy, or possession for seven successive years having a connected title in law or equity, deducible of record, from this state or the United States, or from any public officer or other person authorized by the laws of this state to sell such land for the nonpayment of taxes, or from any sheriff, marshal, or other person authorized to sell such land on execution, or under any order, judgment, or decree of any court of record shall be brought within seven years next after possession has been taken as provided in this section; but when the possessor acquires such title after taking such possession, the limitation shall begin to run from the time of acquiring title.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 601, § 35.

CSA:

C. 40, § 141.

CRS 53:

§ 118-7-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-7-6.

38-41-107.
Rights of heirs.

The heirs, devisees, and assigns of the person having such title and possession shall have the same benefit of sections 38-41-101 to 38-41-106 as the person from whom the possession is derived.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 601, § 36.

CSA:

C. 40, § 142.

CRS 53:

§ 118-7-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-7-7.

38-41-108.
Rights in possession seven years - color of title and payment of taxes.

Every person in the actual possession of lands or tenements, under claim and color of title, made in good faith, who for seven successive years continues in such possession and also during said time pays all taxes legally assessed on such lands or tenements shall be held and adjudged to be the legal owner of said lands or tenements to the extent and according to the purport of his paper title. All persons holding under such possession by purchase, devise, or descent, before said seven years have expired, who continue such possession and continue to pay the taxes as provided in this section, so as to complete the possession and payment of taxes for the term, provided in this section, shall be entitled to the benefit of this section.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 602, § 37.

CSA:

C. 40, § 143.

CRS 53:

§ 118-7-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-7-8.

38-41-109.
When in possession under color of title - unoccupied lands.

Whenever a person having color of title, made in good faith, to vacant and unoccupied land pays all taxes legally assessed thereon for seven successive years, he shall be deemed and adjudged to be the legal owner of said vacant and unoccupied land to the extent and according to the purport of his paper title. All persons holding under such taxpayer, by purchase, devise, or descent, before said seven years have expired, who continue to pay the taxes as provided in this section, so as to complete the payment of taxes for the period of time provided in this section, shall be entitled to the benefit of this section. If any person, having a better paper title to said vacant and unoccupied land, shall during the said term of seven years pay the taxes assessed on said land for any one or more years during the said term of seven years, then such person seeking title under claim of taxes paid, his heirs and assigns, shall not be entitled to the benefit of this section. For the purposes of this part 1 a redemption from a sale for taxes by the party claiming under any of the limitations set forth in this section shall be considered as the equivalent of a payment of taxes.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 602, § 38.

CSA:

C. 40, § 144.

CRS 53:

§ 118-7-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-7-9.

38-41-110.
Payment of delinquent taxes by owner of less than whole property.

The owner of not less than one-tenth undivided interest in real property which he has owned not less than one year may pay and the county treasurer shall receive from him all delinquent taxes due upon the entire or any other fractional interests therein by redemption from prior or subsequent tax sales or by payment of any taxes which are delinquent, or otherwise, and if at the time of such payment he records with the county clerk and recorder a statement describing the property and showing the payment of such taxes under this article, he shall be subrogated to the first and prior lien of the state of Colorado for such taxes and may foreclose such lien at any time after four years from the date when any part of the taxes so paid first became delinquent, in the same manner and with like remedies as a first mortgage; or he shall be entitled to have any such payment allowed as a setoff in any accounting with any other person interested in such property, whether under the provisions of article 44 of title 34, C.R.S., or otherwise. The owner of any other fractional interest may at any time prior to foreclosure pay to the treasurer his pro rata share of such payments, with interest and recording fees which shall be repaid to the lien claimant and for which a redemption certificate shall issue, which, when recorded, shall release such interest from such lien.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 602, § 38.

L. 33:

P. 796, § 1.

CSA:

C. 40, § 145.

CRS 53:

§ 118-7-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-7-10.

38-41-111.
When action will not lie against person in possession.

No action shall be commenced or maintained against a person in possession of real property to question or attack the validity of or to set aside, upon any ground or for any reason whatsoever any final decree or final order of any court of record in this state or any instrument of conveyance, deed, certificate of sale, or release executed by any private trustee, successor in trust, public trustee, sheriff, marshal, county treasurer, or any public official whatsoever, whether named in this section or not, or officer or any appointee of any court when such document is the source of or in aid of or in explanation of the title or chain of title or right of the party in possession or any of his predecessors or grantors insofar as the same may affect the title or explain any matter connected with the title in reference to said real property if such document has been recorded and has remained of record in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county where said real property is situated for a period of seven years. All defects, irregularities, want of service, defective service, lack of jurisdiction, or other grounds of invalidity, nullity, or causes or reasons whereby or wherefore any such document might be set aside or rendered inoperative must be raised in a suit commenced within said seven-year period and not thereafter.

This section shall not apply to any of the following cases:

Forged documents;

During the pendency of an action, commenced prior to the expiration of said seven-year period, to set aside, modify, or annul or otherwise affect such document, and notice of such action has been filed as provided by law;

When such document has been, by proper order or decree of competent court, avoided, annulled, or rendered inoperative;

Where the party, or his predecessor, who brings the action to question, to attack, or to set aside the validity of such documents, has been deprived of possession within two years of the commencement of said action.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 603, § 39.

CSA:

C. 40, § 146.

L. 45:

P. 272, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 118-7-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-7-11.

L. 75:

(2)(d) amended, p. 225, § 84, effective July 16.

38-41-112.
Legal disability - extension of two years.

Persons under legal disability at the time the right of action first accrued who, at the time of the expiration of the limitation applicable, are still under such disability shall have two years from the expiration of a limitation to commence action, and no action shall be maintained by such persons thereafter.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 604, § 40.

CSA:

C. 40, § 147.

CRS 53:

§ 118-7-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-7-12.

38-41-113.
Limitations may be asserted affirmatively or by way of defense.

The limitations provided for in this part 1 may be asserted either affirmatively or by way of defense and may be used in any action as a source of or as a means to establish title or the right of possession or as an aid or explanation of title. Actions may be maintained affirmatively to establish such limitations provided for in this part 1.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 604, § 41.

CSA:

C. 41, § 148.

CRS 53:

§ 118-7-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-7-13.

38-41-114.
When limitations apply.

The limitations established in this part 1 shall apply to causes of action that have accrued prior to March 28, 1927, as well as to all causes of action accruing thereafter. This part 1 shall not be construed as reviving any action barred by any former or other statute.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 604, § 42.

CSA:

C. 40, § 149.

CRS 53:

§ 118-7-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-7-14.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 915, § 25, effective August 6.

38-41-115.
Setting aside judgments against unknown parties.

No action shall be brought after the expiration of one year from March 14, 1923, to set aside any decree or judgment entered in any action brought against unknown parties where there has been a substantial compliance with the requirements of the Colorado rules of civil procedure as to jurisdiction, pleadings, and service of process.

History.

Source:
L. 23:

P. 218, § 1.

Code 35:

§ 50(f).

CRS 53:

§ 118-7-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-7-15.

L. 67:

P. 84, § 1.

38-41-116.
Actions to enforce contracts of sale.

No action or proceeding whatsoever shall be brought or maintained by any person to enforce or procure any right or title accorded to the purchaser under any contract for the purchase and sale of real property if such person is not in possession of the real property described in and the subject of such contract of purchase and sale unless such action or proceeding is commenced within ten years of the day or the happening of the event appointed in said contract for the delivery by the seller of a deed of conveyance of the property therein agreed to be purchased and sold. If no day is appointed in such contract for the delivery of such conveyance, then such action or proceeding shall be commenced within ten years of the day on which the last and final installment of the purchase price would have been paid but not thereafter.

History.

Source:
L. 53:

P. 205, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 118-7-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-7-16.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 225, § 85, effective July 16.

38-41-117.
Actions to enforce bonds for deeds.

No action or proceeding whatsoever shall be brought or maintained by any person who is or may become entitled to have conveyed to him any real property under the terms of any bond for a deed to real property or under the terms of any agreement in the nature of a bond for a deed to real property and who is not in possession of the real property which is the subject of such bond or agreement, to enforce or procure any right or interest granted or assured under the terms thereof or any law or custom relating thereto unless such action or proceeding is commenced within ten years of the day limited therein for the performance of the acts and things upon which the conveyance of such real property is conditioned.

History.

Source:
L. 53:

P. 205, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 118-7-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-7-17.

38-41-118.
Construction of sections.

Sections 38-41-116 to 38-41-118 shall not be construed to alter, modify, amend, or repeal any of the terms and provisions of section 38-35-111.

The limitations imposed by sections 38-41-116 to 38-41-118 shall not apply to any action or proceeding that has been commenced prior to June 1, 1953.

History.

Source:
L. 53:

P. 206, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 118-7-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-7-18.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 916, § 26, effective August 6.

38-41-119.
One-year limitation.

No action shall be commenced or maintained to enforce the terms of any building restriction concerning real property or to compel the removal of any building or improvement on land because of the violation of any terms of any building restriction unless said action is commenced within one year from the date of the violation for which the action is sought to be brought or maintained.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 606, § 47.

CSA:

C. 40, § 154.

CRS 53:

§ 118-8-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-8-4.

L. 72:

P. 616, § 146.